Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Article 3. Corporate Changes.

§ 81-14-101.
Conversion to savings bank.

Any state or federal thrift institution or state or national bank may apply for conversion into a state-chartered savings bank upon the affirmative vote of fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the total number of votes of the members eligible to be cast or an affirmative vote of sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) or more of all the issued and outstanding stock of such institution, at an annual meeting or at any special meeting of the members or stockholders called to consider such action. Upon such affirmative vote, the institution may apply for a certificate of authority by filing with the commissioner a certificate signed by its president or cashier and secretary which sets forth the corporate action herein prescribed and asserts that the institution has complied with the provisions of the laws of the United States. The institution shall also file with the commissioner the plan of conversion and the proposed amendments to its articles of incorporation or articles of association as approved by the members or stockholders for the operation of the institution as a state-chartered savings bank. Upon receipt of the prescribed application, the commissioner shall examine all facts associated with the conversion. The expenses and cost incurred for such special examination shall be paid by the institution applying for permission to convert. The commissioner shall present his findings and recommendations to the State Board of Banking Review for consideration. Upon approval by the State Board of Banking Review, the commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority to the applicant allowing the conversion to proceed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 26; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 145; Laws, 1995, ch. 308, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-103.
Conversion from state to federal charter.

Any state savings bank, stock or mutual, organized and operated under the provisions of this chapter, may convert to a federal charter in accordance with the provisions of the laws and regulations of the United States and with the same force and effect as though originally incorporated under such laws. The procedure to convert shall be as follows:

The savings bank shall submit a plan of conversion to the commissioner, and he may approve the plan, with or without amendment, or reject the plan. If he approves, the plan shall be submitted to the members or stockholders as hereinafter provided. If the commissioner rejects the plan, he shall state his objections in writing and give the converting savings bank an opportunity to amend the plan.

A meeting of the members or stockholders shall be held after fifteen (15) days’ notice to each member or stockholder. The board of directors may provide notice of the meeting to each member or stockholder either by mail, postage prepaid, or by publication of notice, once a week for two (2) weeks preceding such meeting, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where such savings bank has its principal office. The notice may contain the following statement: “The purpose of this meeting is to consider the conversion of this state-chartered savings bank to a federal charter, pursuant to the laws of the United States.” An appropriate officer of the savings bank shall make proof by affidavit at such meeting of due service of the notice for such meeting.

At the meeting of the members or stockholders of such savings bank, such members or stockholders may by affirmative vote of a majority of votes or shares present, in person or by proxy, resolve to convert said savings bank to a federal charter. A certified copy of the minutes from such meeting shall be filed in the office of the commissioner and shall be prima facie evidence of the holding of the meeting.

Within a reasonable time after the receipt of a certified copy of the minutes, the commissioner shall either approve or reject the proceedings of the meeting for compliance with the procedure set forth in this section. If the commissioner approves the proceedings, he shall issue a certificate of his approval of conversion. Such certificate shall be recorded by the savings bank in the office of the Secretary of State. If the commissioner rejects the proceedings, he shall provide a written explanation of his disapproval and notify the savings bank of his disapproval.

The savings bank shall file an application, in the manner prescribed or authorized by the laws and regulations of the United States, to consummate the conversion to a federal charter. A copy of the charter or authorization issued to the savings bank by the appropriate federal regulatory authority shall be filed with the commissioner. Upon filing with the commissioner, the savings bank shall cease to be a state savings bank and shall be a federal depository institution.

Whenever any savings bank shall convert to a federal charter, it shall cease to be a savings bank under the laws of this state; provided, however, that its corporate existence shall be extended for the purpose of prosecuting or defending suits, enabling such savings bank to close its business affairs as a state savings bank, and disposing of and conveying its property. At the time when such conversion becomes effective, all the property of the state savings bank, including all its rights, title and interest in and to all property of whatever kind, and every right, privilege, interest and asset of any conceivable value or benefit then existing, belonging or pertaining to it, or which would inure to it, shall immediately by act of law and without any conveyance or transfer, and without any further act or deed, be vested in and become the property of the federal depository institution which shall have, hold and enjoy such property in its own right as fully as such property was possessed, held and enjoyed by the savings bank; and the federal depository institution as of the effective time of such conversion shall succeed to all the rights, obligations and relations of the state savings bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 27 1994, ch. 622, § 146; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-105.
Simultaneous charter and ownership conversion.

In the event of a state charter to federal charter conversion, when the form of ownership will also simultaneously be changed from stock to mutual, or from mutual to stock, the conversion shall proceed initially as if it involves only a charter conversion under Section 81-14-103. After the savings bank becomes a federal depository institution, then the federal regulatory authority shall govern the continuing conversion of the form of ownership of such newly converted depository institution.

In the event of a federal charter to state charter conversion, when the form of ownership will also simultaneously be changed from stock to mutual or from mutual to stock, the conversion shall proceed initially as if it involves only a charter conversion under Section 81-14-101. After the federal depository institution becomes a state savings bank, the provisions of Section 81-14-107 or Section 81-14-109 shall govern the continuing conversion of the form of ownership of such newly converted savings bank.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any simultaneous charter and ownership conversion accomplished in conjunction with a merger under the provisions of Section 81-14-117.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-107.
Conversion of mutual to stock savings bank.

Any mutual savings bank may convert from mutual to the stock form of ownership as provided in this section.

A mutual savings bank may apply to the commissioner for permission to convert to a stock savings bank and for certification of appropriate amendments to the savings bank’s certificate of incorporation. Upon receipt of an application to convert from mutual to stock form, the commissioner shall examine all facts connected with the requested conversion. The expenses and cost of such examination, monitoring and supervision shall be paid by the savings bank applying for permission to convert.

The savings bank shall submit a plan of conversion as a part of the application to the commissioner. The commissioner may approve it with or without amendment, if it appears that:

After conversion the savings bank will be in sound financial condition and will be soundly managed;

The conversion will not impair the capital of the savings bank nor adversely affect the savings bank’s operations;

The conversion will be fair and equitable to the members of the savings bank and no person whether member, employee or otherwise, will receive any inequitable gain or advantage by reason of the conversion;

The savings bank services provided to the public by the savings bank will not be adversely affected by the conversion;

The substance of the plan has been approved by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the board of directors of the savings bank;

All shares of stock issued in connection with the conversion are offered first to the members of the savings bank;

All stock shall be offered to members of the savings bank and others in prescribed amounts and otherwise pursuant to a formula and procedure which is fair and equitable and will be fairly disclosed to all interested persons;

The plan provides a statement as to whether stockholders shall have preemptive rights to acquire additional or treasury shares of the savings bank.

If the commissioner approves the plan, then the plan shall be submitted to the members as hereinafter provided. If he refuses to approve the plan, the commissioner shall state his objections in writing and give the converting savings bank an opportunity to amend the plan to obviate such objections.

After lawful notice to the members of the savings bank and full and fair disclosure, the plan must be approved by a majority of the total votes which members of the savings bank are eligible and entitled to cast. Such a vote by the members may be in person or by proxy. Following the vote of the members, the results of the vote certified by an appropriate officer of the savings bank shall be filed by the commissioner. The commissioner shall then either approve or disapprove the requested conversion. After approval of the conversion, the commissioner shall supervise and monitor the conversion process and he shall ensure that the conversion is conducted pursuant to law and the savings bank’s approved plan of conversion.

The commissioner may promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to govern conversions; however, such rules and regulations as may be promulgated by the commissioner shall be equal to or exceed the requirements for conversion, if any, imposed by the federal insurer of deposit accounts.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 29; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 147; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 29; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-109.
Conversion of stock savings bank to mutual savings bank.

Any stock savings bank organized and operating under the provisions of this chapter may, subject to the approval of the commissioner, convert to a mutual savings bank under the provisions of this section. The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations governing the conversion of stock savings banks to mutual savings banks. Such rules and regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to requirements that:

The conversion neither impair the capital of the converting savings bank nor adversely affect its operations;

The conversion shall be fair and equitable to all stockholders of the converting savings bank;

The public shall not be adversely affected by the conversion;

Conversion of a savings bank shall be accomplished only pursuant to a plan approved by the commissioner. Such plan must have been approved by an affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the board of directors of the converting savings bank, after a full and fair disclosure to the stockholders, and by an affirmative vote of a majority of the votes which stockholders of the savings bank are entitled to cast;

The plan of conversion provides that:

Deposit accounts will be issued in connection with the conversion to the stockholders of the converting savings bank;

A uniform date will be fixed for the determination of the stockholders to whom, and the amount to each stockholder of which, deposit accounts shall be made available;

Deposit accounts made available to stockholders will be based upon a fair and equitable formula approved by the commissioner and fully and fairly disclosed to the stockholders of the converting savings bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 30; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 30; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-111.
Merger of like savings banks.

Any two (2) or more mutual savings banks, or any two (2) or more stock savings banks, organized and operating, may merge or consolidate into a single savings bank. The procedure to merge shall be as follows:

The directors, or a majority of them, of such savings banks may, at separate meetings, enter into a written agreement of merger. Such agreement shall be signed by the majority of the directors under the corporate seals of the respective savings banks and shall specify each savings bank to be merged and the savings bank which is to receive into itself the merging savings bank or banks. Such agreement shall prescribe the terms and conditions of the merger and the mode of carrying it into effect. The merger agreement may provide such other provisions with respect to the merger as appear necessary or desirable, or as the commissioner may require to enable him to discharge his duties with respect to such merger.

A meeting of the members or stockholders of each of the savings banks shall be held separately upon written notice of not less than fifteen (15) days to members or stockholders of each savings bank. The notice shall specify the time, place and purpose for the meeting. Notice shall be made by personal service or postage prepaid mail to the last address of each member or stockholder appearing upon the records of the savings bank, or by publication of notice, at least once a week for two (2) weeks preceding the meeting, in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the county or counties where each savings bank has its principal or a branch office, or in a newspaper of general circulation in an adjoining county if none is available in the county. An appropriate officer of the savings bank shall make proof by affidavit at such meeting of the due service of the notice for such meeting.

At separate meetings of the members or stockholders of the respective savings banks, the members or stockholders may adopt, by an affirmative vote of a majority of the votes or shares present, in person or by proxy, a resolution to merge into a single savings bank upon the terms of the merger agreement as agreed upon by the directors of the respective savings banks and as approved by the commissioner. Upon the adoption of the resolution, a copy of the minutes of the proceedings of the meetings of the members or stockholders of the respective savings banks certified by an appropriate officer of the merging savings banks shall be filed in the office of the commissioner. Within fifteen (15) days after the receipt of a certified copy of the minutes of such meeting the commissioner shall either approve or disapprove the proceedings for compliance with this section. If the proceedings are approved by him, he shall issue a certificate of his approval of the merger. The certificate shall be filed and recorded in the office of the Secretary of State. When the certificate is so filed, the merger agreement shall take effect according to its terms and shall be binding upon all the members or stockholders of the merging savings banks, and it shall be deemed to be the act of merger of such constituent savings banks under the laws of this state. The certificate or certified copy thereof shall be evidence of the agreement and act of merger of such constituent savings banks under the laws of this state and the observance and performance of all acts and conditions necessary to have been observed and performed precedent to such merger. Within sixty (60) days after its receipt from the Secretary of State, the certified copy of the certificate shall be filed with the registrar of deeds of the county or counties in which the respective savings banks so merged have recorded their original certificates of incorporation. Failure to file shall subject the savings bank to a penalty of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) to be collected by the Secretary of State. If the commissioner disapproves the proceedings, he shall issue a written statement of the reasons for his disapproval and notify the savings bank to that effect.

Upon the merger of any savings bank:

Its corporate existence shall be merged into that of the receiving savings bank; and all its right, title, interest in and to all property of whatsoever kind, and every right, privilege, interest or asset of any conceivable value or benefit then existing belonging or pertaining to it, or which would inure to it under an unmerged existence, shall immediately by act of law and without any conveyance or transfer, and without any further act or deed, be vested in and become the property of such receiving savings bank which shall have, hold and enjoy such property in its own right as fully as if such property were possessed, held or enjoyed by the savings banks so merged; and such receiving savings bank shall absorb fully and completely the savings bank or banks so merged.

Its rights, liabilities, obligations and relations to any person shall remain unchanged and the savings bank into which it has been merged shall succeed to all the relations, obligations and liabilities as though it had assumed or incurred the same. No obligation or liability of a member, customer or stockholder in a savings bank shall be affected by the merger, but obligations and liabilities shall continue as they existed before the merger, unless otherwise provided in the merger agreement.

A pending action or other judicial proceeding to which any merging savings bank is a party shall not be deemed to have abated or to have discontinued by reason of the merger, but may be prosecuted to final judgment, order or decree as if the merger had not occurred; or the receiving savings bank may be substituted as a party to such action or proceeding, and any judgment, order or decree may be rendered for or against the receiving savings bank as if the merger had not occurred.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the commissioner may waive any of the foregoing requirements upon finding that such waiver would be in the best interest of the members or stockholders of the merging savings banks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 31; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 148; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 31; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-113.
Merger of savings banks where ownership is converted.

Any two (2) or more state mutual savings banks may merge to form a single state stock savings bank in separate merger-conversion proceedings or in simultaneous merger-conversion proceedings.

Any two (2) or more state stock savings banks may merge to form a single state mutual savings bank in separate merger-conversion proceedings or in simultaneous merger-conversion proceedings.

The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations to facilitate the transition from two (2) or more savings banks to a single savings bank under a new form of ownership.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-115.
Merger of mutual and stock savings banks.

Any two (2) or more savings banks, when one or more is mutually owned and one or more is stock owned, may merge to form either a mutual or stock savings bank in separate conversion-merger proceedings and in simultaneous conversion-merger proceedings.

The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations to facilitate the merger of mutual and stock savings banks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 33; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 33; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-117.
Simultaneous merger and conversion.

Any combination of associations and state savings banks may merge to form either an association or state savings bank.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to facilitate the merger of associations and state savings banks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 34; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 34; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-119.
Merger of federal charters with state savings banks.

Any two (2) or more depository institutions, when one or more is a state savings bank and one or more is a federal depository institution operating in Mississippi, may merge under either a state savings bank charter or a federal charter.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to facilitate the merger of federal depository institutions and state savings banks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 35; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 35; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-121.
Voluntary dissolution by stockholders or members.

At any annual or special meeting called for such purpose, a savings bank may, by an affirmative vote in person or by proxy of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the total number of shares or votes which all members or stockholders of the association are entitled to cast, resolve to dissolve and liquidate the savings bank and adopt a plan of voluntary dissolution. Upon adoption of such resolution and plan of voluntary dissolution, the members or stockholders shall proceed to elect not more than three (3) liquidators who shall post bond as required by the commissioner. The liquidators shall have full power to execute the plan. The procedure thereafter shall be as follows:

A copy of the resolution certified by an appropriate officer of the savings bank, the minutes of the meeting of members or stockholders, the plan of liquidation and an itemized statement of the savings bank’s assets and liabilities sworn to by a majority of its board of directors, shall be filed with the commissioner. The minutes of the meeting of members or stockholders shall be certified by an appropriate officer of the institution and shall set forth the notice given and the time of mailing thereof, the vote on the resolution and the total number of shares or votes which all members of the savings bank were entitled to cast thereon, and the names of the liquidators elected.

If the commissioner finds that the proceedings are in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and that the plan of liquidation is not reasonably unfair to any person affected, he shall attach his certificate of approval to the plan and shall forward one (1) copy to the liquidators and one (1) copy to the savings bank’s federal deposit account insurance corporation. Once the commissioner has approved the resolution and the plan of liquidation, it shall thereafter be unlawful for such savings bank to accept any additional deposit accounts or additions to deposit accounts or make any additional loans. All of the income and receipts in excess of actual expenses of liquidation of the savings bank shall be applied to the discharge of its liabilities.

The liquidator or liquidators so appointed shall be paid a reasonable compensation by the liquidating savings bank subject to the approval of the commissioner.

The plan shall become effective upon the recording of the commissioner’s certificate of approval in the manner required by this chapter for the recording of the certificate of incorporation.

The liquidation of the savings bank shall be subject to the supervision and examination of the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 36; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 36; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-123.
Rules, regulations and reports of voluntary dissolution.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the dissolution and liquidation of state savings banks.

Upon completion of liquidation, the liquidators shall file with the commissioner a final report and accounting of the liquidation. The approval of the report by the commissioner shall operate as a complete and final discharge of the liquidators, the board of directors and each member or stockholder in connection with the liquidation of the savings bank. Upon approval of the report, the commissioner shall issue a certificate of dissolution of the savings bank and shall record such certificate in the manner required by this chapter for the recording of certificates of incorporation. Upon such recording, the dissolution shall be effective.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 37; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 37; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-125.
Stock dividends.

No savings bank shall declare or pay any dividend upon its common stock unless such savings bank has received written approval by the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance. Directors declaring a dividend in violation of the provisions of this section shall be personally liable to the full amount of the dividend so declared and it shall be the duty of the commissioner, upon discovering the payment of any such dividend, to forthwith make demand upon the directors that the same be restored to the savings bank, and upon their failure so to do he shall cause suit to be brought against them in the chancery court of the county in which the savings bank is located, either in his name or in the name of the savings bank, to recover the same for the benefit of the savings bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 38; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 33; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 38; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-127.
Supervisory mergers, consolidations, conversions and combination mergers and conversions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in order to protect the public, the commissioner, upon making a finding that a state savings bank is unable to operate in a safe and sound manner, may authorize or require a short form merger and conversion of the state savings bank, or any other transaction, as to which the finding is made.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to govern mergers, consolidations, conversions, combination mergers and conversions and other supervisory action authorized by this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 39; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 39; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-129.
Interim savings banks.

Article 2 of this chapter shall not apply to applications for permission to organize an interim state savings bank so long as the application is approved by the commissioner.

Preliminary approval of an application for permission to organize an interim state savings bank shall be conditional upon the commissioner’s approval of an application to merge the interim savings bank and an existing stock savings bank or on the commissioner’s approval of any other transaction.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to govern the formation of interim savings banks authorized by this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 40; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 40; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 40, eff from and after July 1, 2001.